Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. Free Textbooks and Supplies

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 322 to 325.

79 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 786 to 788.

§ 21-9-201.
Boards of trustees to purchase and lend to pupils; responsibility of pupils; sale of surplus.

The board of trustees of each school district within the state shall purchase all textbooks necessary to the operation of the schools under its jurisdiction. Each such board may in addition purchase such supplies as it deems necessary. Such textbooks and supplies shall be held as the property of the district and shall be loaned to pupils free of any charge; provided, the pupils shall be held responsible for damage to, loss of, or failure to return such books and supplies except those that by their nature are expended during the course of study.

The board may sell to any pupil or parent, at its cost, any surplus books or supplies it has purchased and which such pupil or parent desires to purchase for his own use.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 29, §§ 1, 9, 10; R.S. 1899, §§ 597, 606, 607; Laws 1901, ch. 38, § 1; C.S. 1910, §§ 2002 Sp. Sess., 2011, 2012; C.S. 1920, §§ 2315, 2324, 2325; Laws 1927, ch. 89, §§ 5, 6; R.S. 1931, §§ 99-1401 to 99-1403; C.S. 1945, §§ 67-1801 to 67-1803; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-267 to 21-269; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 181; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-181.

§ 21-9-202.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 19, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1899, ch. 29, § 1, related to a restriction on the sale of school supplies to a school district by school trustees, officers or employees of the district.

§ 21-9-203.
Purchase and use of eye protective devices.

Every teacher and every pupil except nonparticipating visitors, in any public school participating in any course involving the following: (1) hot molten metals; (2) milling, sawing, turning, shaping, cutting or stamping of any solid materials with stationary power equipment; (3) gas or electric arc welding; (4) caustic or explosive materials; or (5) any other material or activity which creates a substantial risk of harm to the eyes is required to wear industrial quality eye protective devices meeting the standards of the American Standard Safety Code for head, eye, and respiratory protection, Z2.1-1959, promulgated by the American Standards Association, Incorporated.

The board of trustees of each school district shall purchase such eye protective devices and cause them to be available free of charge to all pupils and teachers involved in the activities listed above; provided, that the board of trustees shall not be required to furnish protective corrective lenses.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 100, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-37.1; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 183; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-183; Laws 1971, ch. 95, § 1.